Illinois, session 104th, SB3849.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-175 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-175)7    Sec. 15-175. General homestead exemption. 8    (a) Except as provided in Sections 15-176 and 15-177, 9homestead property is entitled to an annual homestead 10exemption limited, except as described here with relation to 11cooperatives or life care facilities, to a reduction in the 12equalized assessed value of homestead property equal to the 13increase in equalized assessed value for the current 14assessment year above the equalized assessed value of the 15property for 1977, up to the maximum reduction set forth 16below. If however, the 1977 equalized assessed value upon 17which taxes were paid is subsequently determined by local 18assessing officials, the Property Tax Appeal Board, or a court 19to have been excessive, the equalized assessed value which 20should have been placed on the property for 1977 shall be used 21to determine the amount of the exemption.22    (b) Except as provided in Section 15-176, the maximum 23reduction before taxable year 2004 shall be $4,500 in counties   SB3849- 2 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $3,500 in all other 2counties. Except as provided in Sections 15-176 and 15-177, 3for taxable years 2004 through 2007, the maximum reduction 4shall be $5,000, for taxable year 2008, the maximum reduction 5is $5,500, and, for taxable years 2009 through 2011, the 6maximum reduction is $6,000 in all counties. For taxable years 72012 through 2016, the maximum reduction is $7,000 in counties 8with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $6,000 in all other 9counties. For taxable years 2017 through 2022, the maximum 10reduction is $10,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants and $6,000 in all other counties. For taxable 12years 2023 through 2026 and thereafter, the maximum reduction 13is $10,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 14$8,000 in counties that are contiguous to a county of 153,000,000 or more inhabitants, and $6,000 in all other 16counties. For taxable year 2027 and thereafter, the maximum 17reduction in all counties shall be the maximum reduction for 18the immediately preceding taxable year, increased by the 19percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index 20during the 12-month period ending on September 30 of the 21immediately preceding taxable year. If a county has elected to 22subject itself to the provisions of Section 15-176 as provided 23in subsection (k) of that Section, then, for the first taxable 24year only after the provisions of Section 15-176 no longer 25apply, for owners who, for the taxable year, have not been 26granted a senior citizens assessment freeze homestead   SB3849- 3 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1exemption under Section 15-172 or a long-time occupant 2homestead exemption under Section 15-177, there shall be an 3additional exemption of $5,000 for owners with a household 4income of $30,000 or less. 5    (c) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if, 6based on the most recent assessment, the equalized assessed 7value of the homestead property for the current assessment 8year is greater than the equalized assessed value of the 9property for 1977, the owner of the property shall 10automatically receive the exemption granted under this Section 11in an amount equal to the increase over the 1977 assessment up 12to the maximum reduction set forth in this Section.13    (d) If in any assessment year beginning with the 2000 14assessment year, homestead property has a pro-rata valuation 15under Section 9-180 resulting in an increase in the assessed 16valuation, a reduction in equalized assessed valuation equal 17to the increase in equalized assessed value of the property 18for the year of the pro-rata valuation above the equalized 19assessed value of the property for 1977 shall be applied to the 20property on a proportionate basis for the period the property 21qualified as homestead property during the assessment year. 22The maximum proportionate homestead exemption shall not exceed 23the maximum homestead exemption allowed in the county under 24this Section divided by 365 and multiplied by the number of 25days the property qualified as homestead property.26    (d-1) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants,   SB3849- 4 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1where the chief county assessment officer provides a notice of 2discovery, if a property is not occupied by its owner as a 3principal residence as of January 1 of the current tax year, 4then the property owner shall notify the chief county 5assessment officer of that fact on a form prescribed by the 6chief county assessment officer. That notice must be received 7by the chief county assessment officer on or before March 1 of 8the collection year. If mailed, the form shall be sent by 9certified mail, return receipt requested. If the form is 10provided in person, the chief county assessment officer shall 11provide a date stamped copy of the notice. Failure to provide 12timely notice pursuant to this subsection (d-1) shall result 13in the exemption being treated as an erroneous exemption. Upon 14timely receipt of the notice for the current tax year, no 15exemption shall be applied to the property for the current tax 16year. If the exemption is not removed upon timely receipt of 17the notice by the chief assessment officer, then the error is 18considered granted as a result of a clerical error or omission 19on the part of the chief county assessment officer as 20described in subsection (h) of Section 9-275, and the property 21owner shall not be liable for the payment of interest and 22penalties due to the erroneous exemption for the current tax 23year for which the notice was filed after the date that notice 24was timely received pursuant to this subsection. Notice 25provided under this subsection shall not constitute a defense 26or amnesty for prior year erroneous exemptions.   SB3849- 5 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1    For the purposes of this subsection (d-1): 2    "Collection year" means the year in which the first and 3second installment of the current tax year is billed. 4    "Current tax year" means the year prior to the collection 5year. 6    (e) The chief county assessment officer may, when 7considering whether to grant a leasehold exemption under this 8Section, require the following conditions to be met: 9        (1) that a notarized application for the exemption, 10    signed by both the owner and the lessee of the property, 11    must be submitted each year during the application period 12    in effect for the county in which the property is located; 13        (2) that a copy of the lease must be filed with the 14    chief county assessment officer by the owner of the 15    property at the time the notarized application is 16    submitted;17        (3) that the lease must expressly state that the 18    lessee is liable for the payment of property taxes; and 19        (4) that the lease must include the following language 20    in substantially the following form: 21            "Lessee shall be liable for the payment of real 22        estate taxes with respect to the residence in 23        accordance with the terms and conditions of Section 24        15-175 of the Property Tax Code (35 ILCS 200/15-175). 25        The permanent real estate index number for the 26        premises is (insert number), and, according to the   SB3849- 6 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1        most recent property tax bill, the current amount of 2        real estate taxes associated with the premises is 3        (insert amount) per year. The parties agree that the 4        monthly rent set forth above shall be increased or 5        decreased pro rata (effective January 1 of each 6        calendar year) to reflect any increase or decrease in 7        real estate taxes. Lessee shall be deemed to be 8        satisfying Lessee's liability for the above mentioned 9        real estate taxes with the monthly rent payments as 10        set forth above (or increased or decreased as set 11        forth herein).". 12    In addition, if there is a change in lessee, or if the 13lessee vacates the property, then the chief county assessment 14officer may require the owner of the property to notify the 15chief county assessment officer of that change. 16    This subsection (e) does not apply to leasehold interests 17in property owned by a municipality. 18    (f) As used in this Section:19    "Consumer Price Index" means the index published by the 20Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 21Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 22services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 23average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 24    "Homestead property" means under this Section includes 25residential property that is occupied by its owner or owners 26as his or their principal dwelling place, or that is a   SB3849- 7 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1leasehold interest on which a single family residence is 2situated, which is occupied as a residence by a person who has 3an ownership interest therein, legal or equitable or as a 4lessee, and on which the person is liable for the payment of 5property taxes. For land improved with an apartment building 6owned and operated as a cooperative, the maximum reduction 7from the equalized assessed value shall be limited to the 8increase in the value above the equalized assessed value of 9the property for 1977, up to the maximum reduction set forth 10above, multiplied by the number of apartments or units 11occupied by a person or persons who is liable, by contract with 12the owner or owners of record, for paying property taxes on the 13property and is an owner of record of a legal or equitable 14interest in the cooperative apartment building, other than a 15leasehold interest. For land improved with a life care 16facility, the maximum reduction from the value of the 17property, as equalized by the Department, shall be multiplied 18by the number of apartments or units occupied by a person or 19persons, irrespective of any legal, equitable, or leasehold 20interest in the facility, who are liable, under a life care 21contract with the owner or owners of record of the facility, 22for paying property taxes on the property. For purposes of 23this Section, the term "life care facility" has the meaning 24stated in Section 15-170.25    "Household", as used in this Section, means the owner, the 26spouse of the owner, and all persons using the residence of the   SB3849- 8 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1owner as their principal place of residence.2    "Household income", as used in this Section, means the 3combined income of the members of a household for the calendar 4year preceding the taxable year.5    "Income", as used in this Section, has the same meaning as 6provided in Section 3.07 of the Senior Citizens and Persons 7with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, except that 8"income" does not include veteran's benefits. 9    "Life care facility" has the meaning given to that term in 10Section 15-170. 11    (g) In a cooperative or life care facility where a 12homestead exemption has been granted, the cooperative 13association or the management of the cooperative or life care 14facility shall credit the savings resulting from that 15exemption only to the apportioned tax liability of the owner 16or resident who qualified for the exemption. Any person who 17willfully refuses to so credit the savings shall be guilty of a 18Class B misdemeanor. 19    (h) Where married persons maintain and reside in separate 20residences qualifying as homestead property, each residence 21shall receive 50% of the total reduction in equalized assessed 22valuation provided by this Section.23    (i) In all counties, the assessor or chief county 24assessment officer may determine the eligibility of 25residential property to receive the homestead exemption and 26the amount of the exemption by application, visual inspection,   SB3849- 9 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1questionnaire or other reasonable methods. The determination 2shall be made in accordance with guidelines established by the 3Department, provided that the taxpayer applying for an 4additional general exemption under this Section shall submit 5to the chief county assessment officer an application with an 6affidavit of the applicant's total household income, age, 7marital status (and, if married, the name and address of the 8applicant's spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of 9members of the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The 10Department shall issue guidelines establishing a method for 11verifying the accuracy of the affidavits filed by applicants 12under this paragraph. The applications shall be clearly marked 13as applications for the Additional General Homestead 14Exemption. 15    (i-5) This subsection (i-5) applies to counties with 163,000,000 or more inhabitants. In the event of a sale of 17homestead property, the homestead exemption shall remain in 18effect for the remainder of the assessment year of the sale. 19Upon receipt of a transfer declaration transmitted by the 20recorder pursuant to Section 31-30 of the Real Estate Transfer 21Tax Law for property receiving an exemption under this 22Section, the assessor shall mail a notice and forms to the new 23owner of the property providing information pertaining to the 24rules and applicable filing periods for applying or reapplying 25for homestead exemptions under this Code for which the 26property may be eligible. If the new owner fails to apply or   SB3849- 10 -LRB104 17207 HLH 30627 b1reapply for a homestead exemption during the applicable filing 2period or the property no longer qualifies for an existing 3homestead exemption, the assessor shall cancel such exemption 4for any ensuing assessment year. 5    (j) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, in 6the event of a sale of homestead property the homestead 7exemption shall remain in effect for the remainder of the 8assessment year of the sale. The assessor or chief county 9assessment officer may require the new owner of the property 10to apply for the homestead exemption for the following 11assessment year.12    (k) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 13Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 14implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 15    (l) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 16Act of the 100th General Assembly are effective for the 2018 17tax year and thereafter. 18(Source: P.A. 102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.